Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1721
Hearing, when held.

If the obligor requests a hearing, the department shall hold a hearing, if required by section 43-1720, within fifteen days of the date of receipt of the request, and the hearing shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. The assignment shall be held in abeyance pending the outcome of the hearing. The department shall notify the obligor and the county attorney or authorized attorney of its decision within fifteen days of the date the hearing is held.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 41;

Laws 1986, LB 600, § 4;

Laws 1991, LB 457, § 30.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.